Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 6 Medical Assistance for Aged

49-4-120 through 49-4-128.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 16, effective July 1, 1999.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 16, effective July 1, 1999, repealed and reserved this article. The former article, concerning “The Medical Assistance for the Aged Act”, consisted of Code Sections 49-4-120 through 49-4-128 and was based on Ga. L. 1961, p. 170, §§ 1 through 6, and 8 through 10; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 49; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49.

Code Section 49-4-121 was amended by Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 49. However, this amendment was not given effect due to the reserving of this article by Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 16.